Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.115

Regional committees—Membership limitation.

Persons possessing the status of any of the following positions shall not be eligible to be a member of a regional committee: The superintendent of public instruction, a member of the state board of education, an educational service district superintendent, a member of a board of directors of a school district, a member of an educational service district board, a member of a governing board of either a private school or a private school district which conducts any grades kindergarten through twelve, officers appointed by any such governing board, and employees of a school district, an educational service district, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, a private school, or a private school district.

[ 1985 c 385 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 79; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 115; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.031. Prior: 1947 c 226 s 11, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-30, part; prior: 1941 c 248 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4709-3, part. Formerly RCW 28A.315.050, 28A.57.031, 28.57.030, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.